Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-908
Department; victim; diagnostic assessment; referral; followup.

The department shall, as soon as possible after initial contact with the victim, determine through diagnostic assessment which programs are needed and desired by the victim and family members. The department shall make appropriate referral and conduct appropriate followup. The department shall, to the extent possible, use private sources to provide the support services.

Laws 1978, LB 623, § 8.